District of Columbia statutes.
1-616.01

Repealed

Adverse actions.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1601, 25 DCR 5740
Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-109, § 4(a), 27 DCR 3785
Sept. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-19, § 14(a), 32 DCR 3590
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 3(t), 33 DCR 7241
Mar. 24, 1990, D.C. Law 8-98, § 2, 37 DCR 1058
May 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-128, § 2(a), 37 DCR 2099
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 302(s), 43 DCR 2978
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(r), 45 DCR 2464
Applicability of § 101(r) of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(c) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12-264, provided that § 101(h), (l), (m), (n), (o)(2) through (5), (q), (r), (t), (u), (w), and (y) of the act shall apply as of October 21, 1998.
For temporary amendment of § 401 of the Omnibus Personnel Reform Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-124), see § 2 of the Personnel Reform Technical Amendment Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-520, December 4, 1998, 45 DCR 9049).
1973 Ed., § 1-346.1.
1981 Ed., § 1-617.1.
Procurement, criteria for Council review of multiyear contracts and contracts in excess of $1 million, see § 2-301.05a.
Office of police complaints, referral to the United States Attorney, see § 5-1109.
Office of police complaints, authority, complaint processing procedures, see § 5-1107.